District of Columbia statutes.
1-604.04

Issuance of rules and regulations affecting personnel for employees of the District of Columbia.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters II, IV, VII, VIII, VIII-B, IX, IX-A, X-A, XI, XII, XIII, XIII-A, XV, XVI-A, XVII, XVIII, XIX, XX, XX-A, XXI, XXII, XXIII, XXIV, XXV, XXVI, XXVII, XXVIII, XXIX, XXX, XXXI, XXXII, and XXXIV of this chapter, for all employees of the District of Columbia, except as may be otherwise provided in this subchapter.

(b)

The District of Columbia Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia shall each issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapter VIII-A of this chapter.

(c)

(1)

The District of Columbia Board of Education shall issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters VII, XIII, XIX, XXIV, and XXVII of this chapter, and §§ 1-602.03, 1-604.03 and 1-611.11 for educational employees under its respective jurisdictions.

(2)

The Board of the University of the District of Columbia shall issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters VII and XXVII of this chapter, and §§ 1-602.03, 1-604.03, and 1-611.11 for educational employees under its jurisdiction.

(3)

Repealed.

(d)

The District of Columbia Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia shall each issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters XII, XIII-A, XVI-A, XVII, XXV, and XXXI of this chapter, and § 1-602.02(2) for all employees under their respective jurisdictions.

(e)

The Public Employee Relations Board shall issue rules and regulations to carry out its authority under subchapters V and XVII of this chapter.

(f)

The Office of Employee Appeals shall issue rules and regulations to carry out its authority under subchapter VI of this chapter.

(g)

The District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics shall issue rules and regulations to carry out its authority under subchapter XXV of this chapter.

(h)

Except where proscribed by law or issued under the authority of subsection (e), (f), or (g) of this section, rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be a bar to collective bargaining during the negotiation process with an exclusively recognized labor organization.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 404, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(f), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(e), 43 DCR 2978
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(b), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 103(d), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 3(b), 49 DCR 8140

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-604.05, § 1-606.03, and § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-604.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-334.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (d), which previously read:
“(a) The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters II, IV, VII, VIII, IX-B, X, XI, XII, XIII, XIV, XV, XVI, XVII, XVIII, XIX, XX, XXI, XXII, XXIII, XXIV, XXV, XXVI, XXVII, XXVIII, XXIX, XXX, XXXI, XXXII, XXXIII, and XXXV of this chapter, for all employees of the District of Columbia, except as may be otherwise provided in this subchapter.”
“(d) The District of Columbia Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia shall each issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of subchapters XIII, XV, XVII, XVIII, XXVI, and XXXII of this chapter, and § 1-602.2(2) for all employees under their respective jurisdictions.”
D.C. Law 14-213, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).

Mayor's Orders

Delegation of Personnel Authority in the Metropolitan Police Department to the Chief of Police: See Mayor’s Order 97-88, May 9, 1997 ( 44 DCR 2959).

Editor's Notes

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.